pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Patinação inline e sobre rodas > Patins in-line: Patins inline para fitness; Patins in-line para hóquei; Patins inline de corrida; Patins inline recreativos; Patins inline urbanos
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Jazda na inline a kolieskových korčuliach > Inline korčule: Fitness inline korčule; Hokejové inline korčule; Závodné inline korčule; Rekreačné inline korčule; Mestské inline korčule
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 直排輪/雙排輪 > 直排輪: 健身直排輪; 曲棍球直排輪鞋; 競速直排輪; 休閒直排輪; 城市直排輪
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Inline & Roller Skating > Inline Skates: Fitness Inline Skates; Hockey Inline Skates; Race Inline Skates; Recreation Inline Skates; Urban Inline Skates
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > อินไลน์และโรลเลอร์สเกต > อินไลน์สเกต: อินไลน์สเกตเพื่อฟิตเนส; อินไลน์สเกตฮอกกี้; อินไลน์สเกตสำหรับแข่ง; อินไลน์สเกตเพื่อสันทนาการ; อินไลน์สเกตสำหรับสัญจรในเมือง
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 인라인/롤러 스케이팅 > 인라인 스케이트: 피트니스 인라인 스케이트; 하키 인라인스케이트; 레이싱 인라인 스케이트; 취미용 인라인 스케이트; 도시형 인라인 스케이트
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Patinagem com patins em linha e de 4 rodas > Patins em linha: Patins em linha para fitness; Patins em linha de hóquei; Patins em linha para corrida; Patins em linha recreativos; Patins em linha urbanos
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Patinaj cu role în linie și patinaj cu rotile > Patine cu role în linie: Patine fitness cu role în linie; Patine cu role pentru hochei; Patine de curse cu role în linie; Patine de agrement cu role în linie; Patine cu role în linie de oraș
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Jazda na wrotkach i łyżworolkach > Łyżworolki: Łyżworolki fitness; Rolki hokejowe; Łyżworolki wyścigowe; Łyżworolki rekreacyjne; Łyżworolki miejskie
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Rulleskøjter og inlinere > Inlineskøjter: Inlineskøjter – fitness; Inline-hockeyskøjter; Inlineskøjter – race; Inlineskøjter – fritid; Inlineskøjter – urban
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > インラインスケート・ローラースケート > インラインスケート靴: フィットネス用インラインスケート靴; ホッケー用インラインスケート; レース用インラインスケート靴; リクリエーション用インラインスケート靴; アーバンインラインスケート靴
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Skaten > Inline-Skates: Fitness-Inline-Skates; Inline-Hockey-Skates; Inline-Skates für Rennen; Freizeit-Inline-Skates; Urban-Inline-Skates
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Πατινάζ εντός & εκτός δρόμου > Τροχοπέδιλα μονής σειράς τροχών: Τροχοπέδιλα μονής σειράς τροχών Fitness; Inline πατίνια χόκεϊ; Αγωνιστικά τροχοπέδιλα μονής σειράς τροχών; Τροχοπέδιλα μονής σειράς τροχών αναψυχής; Τροχοπέδιλα μονής σειράς τροχών πόλης
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Patin à roulettes et roller > Roller en ligne: Rollers de fitness; Rollers en ligne de hockey; Rollers de course; Rollers récréatifs; Rollers urbains
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Inline- och rullskridskoåkning > Inlineskridskor: Inlines för fitness; Hockey-inlines; Racinginlines; Fritidsinlines; Stadsinlines
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > In-line a kolečkové brusle > Inline brusle: Fitness in-linové brusle; Hokejové inline brusle; Závodní in-linové brusle; Rekreační in-linové brusle; Urban in-linové brusle
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Ratukinių pačiūžų ir riedučių sportas > Ratukinės pačiūžos: Sveikatingumo ratukinės pačiūžos; Ledo ritulio ratukinės pačiūžos; Lenktyninės ratukinės pačiūžos; Pramoginės ratukinės pačiūžos; Miesto ratukinės pačiūžos
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Rolanje i koturanje > Role: Role za fitness; Role za hokej; Role za utrke; Role za rekreaciju; Role za ulicu
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Patinaje sobre ruedas y en línea > Patines en línea: Patines en línea para fitness; Patines en línea de hockey; Patines en línea de competición; Patines en línea de recreación; Patines en línea urbanos
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Inline og rulleskøyter > Inline-skøyter: Fitness-inline-skøyter; Inline-hockeyskøyter; Racing-inline-skøyter; Fritidsinline-skøyter; Urban-inline-skøyter
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Inline ve Roller Paten > Slalom Patenleri: Fitness Inline Paten; Hokey sıralı patenleri; Yarış Inline Paten; Rekreasyon Inline Paten; Kentsel Inline Paten
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Rolanje in kotalkanje > Rolerji: Rolerji za fitnes; Drsalke za hokej; Tekmovalni rolerji; Rolerji za rekreacijo; Mestni rolerji
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 直排轮滑/四轮旱冰 > 直排溜冰鞋: 健身直排轮滑鞋; 轮滑球直排轮滑鞋; 竞赛直排轮滑鞋; 休闲直排轮滑鞋; 城市直排轮滑鞋
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Inlineskaten en rollerskaten > Inlineschaatsen: Fitness-inlineschaatsen; Hockey-inline-skates; Race-inlineschaatsen; Recreatie-inlineschaatsen; Urban inlineschaatsen
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Rullaluistelu > Inline-rullaluistimet: Inline-rullaluistimet fitnesskäyttöön; Rullakiekkoluistimet; Inline-rullaluistimet kilpakäyttöön; Inline-rullaluistimet vapaa-ajan käyttöön; Inline-rullaluistimet kaupunkikäyttöön
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Катание на роликах > Роликовые коньки: Роликовые фитнес-коньки; Хоккейные роликовые коньки; Роликовые коньки для скоростного катания; Прогулочные роликовые коньки; Роликовые коньки для городского катания
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Inline- és görkorcsolya > Inline-korcsolyák: Fitnesz inline-korcsolyák; Inline hokikorcsolyák; Verseny inline-korcsolyák; Szabadidős inline-korcsolyák; Városi inline-korcsolyák
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Pattinaggio in linea e tradizionale > Pattini in linea: Pattini in linea per fitness; Pattini in linea da hockey; Pattini in linea da corsa; Pattini in linea ricreativi; Pattini in linea urbani
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Trượt pa-tanh và pa-tanh một hàng > Trượt patin: Giày trượt pa-tanh thể dục một hàng; Giày trượt patin khúc côn cầu; Giày trượt pa-tanh thi đấu một hàng; Giày trượt pa-tanh giải trí một hàng; Giày trượt pa-tanh đô thị một hàng
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Каране на ролери и ролкови кънки > Ролери: Ролери за спортни тренировки; Ролери за хокей; Състезателни ролери; Ролери за дълги разстояния; Ролери за градска среда